California, session 20252026, SB650.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 85202 of the Water Code is amended to read:85202. Council members shall possess diverse expertise and reflect a statewide perspective. It is the intent of the Legislature that the council appointees have knowledge about the Delta.SEC. 2. Section 85225.10 of the Water Code is amended to read:85225.10. (a) Any person who claims that a proposed covered action is inconsistent with the Delta Plan and, as a result of that inconsistency, the action will have a significant adverse impact on the achievement of one or both of the coequal goals or implementation of government-sponsored flood control programs to reduce risks to people and property in the Delta, may file an appeal with regard to a certification of consistency submitted to the council.(b) The appeal shall clearly and specifically set forth the basis for the claim, including specific factual allegations, that the covered action is inconsistent with the Delta Plan. The council may request from the appellant additional information necessary to clarify, amplify, correct, or otherwise supplement the information submitted with the appeal, within a reasonable period.(c) The council, or by delegation the executive officer, may dismiss the appeal for failure of the appellant to provide information requested by the council within the period provided, if the information requested is in the possession or under the control of the appellant.(d) For purposes of this section, “person” includes a person as defined in Section 19, and any state or local public agency, as defined in Section 10535.SEC. 3. Section 85310 is added to the Water Code, to read:85310. The provisions of the Delta Plan are severable. If any provision of the Delta Plan is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.SEC. 4. Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 85360) is added to Part 4 of Division 35 of the Water Code, to read: CHAPTER 4. Legal Action85360. (a) A legal challenge to the council’s adoption or amendment of the Delta Plan or its appeals procedures adopted pursuant to Section 85225.30 shall be brought pursuant to Section 1085 of the Code of Civil Procedure within 90 days of the date of the council’s final decision.(b) A legal challenge to the council’s determination of an appeal decided pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 85225) of Part 3 shall be brought pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure within 90 days of the date the council adopts its written findings pursuant to Section 85225.25.